Utah statutes.
49-11-614.   Vesting on termination of system or plan.

If any system or the Utah Governors' and Legislators' Retirement Plan is terminated, the accrued benefits of each member in the terminated system or plan shall immediately become vested and nonforfeitable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 250, 2002 General Session

